Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 3 Operation of Trains at Crossings

Cross references.

Manner of operation of motor vehicles at railroad grade crossings, §

40-6-140

et seq.

46-8-190 through 46-8-193.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 212, §§ 2-5; Ga. L. 1931, p. 229, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 94-506-94-508, 94-510, 94-9902, 94-9903, 94-9905; Ga. L. 1947, p. 479, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 5/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 5/SB 285 repealed and reserved these Code sections, effective July 1, 2006.

46-8-194.
Erection and maintenance of crossbuck signs at highway grade crossings; conformance of signs to Department of Transportation standards.

By July 31, 1976, each railroad company shall erect and continue to maintain a reflectorized railroad crossbuck sign at each grade crossing where a railroad crossbuck sign is required by Georgia law to be erected. Such reflectorized railroad crossbuck signs shall conform to standards established by the Georgia Department of Transportation.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 97, § 1.

Cross references.

For further provisions regarding installation of protective devices at grade crossings, §

32-6-200

,

32-6-202

.

46-8-195.
Bringing of actions to compel railroad companies to post crossbuck signs.

The Georgia Department of Transportation or, with respect to roads under its jurisdiction, the governing authority of a county or an incorporated municipality may bring an action in the appropriate superior court to compel a railroad company from posting reflectorized railroad crossbuck signs, as such duty is imposed by Code Section 46-8-194.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 97, § 2.

Cross references.

For further provisions regarding installation of protective devices at grade crossings, see §§

32-6-200

,

32-6-202

.

46-8-196.
Use of standard signs for highway crossings and for advertising or other purposes; mutilation, destruction, and defacement of standard signs; removal of unauthorized signs by county authorities.

It shall be the duty of the Public Service Commission to designate a standard sign or signs and to require the use of same by railroad companies to indicate crossings of public highways across railroads. It shall be unlawful for any person to use a sign similar thereto for advertising or for any other purpose; and it shall be unlawful to mutilate, destroy, or deface any crossing sign. The county authorities in charge of the roads of any county where a sign is erected contrary to this law shall have the duty of removing and destroying that sign.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $50.00 or by imprisonment for a period not to exceed 12 months, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 268, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 94-511, 94-9906; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Cross references.

Promulgation by Department of Transportation of uniform regulations governing signs and signals, on public roads, and as to erection, placement, or maintenance of unauthorized signs and signals, §§

32-6-50

,

32-6-51

.

46-8-197.
Legal responsibility of member of train crew, yard crew, or engine crew for occupying or blocking street, road, or highway grade crossing pursuant to employer’s order.

No member of a train crew, yard crew, or engine crew of a railroad common carrier shall be held personally responsible under, or found guilty of violating, any state laws or municipal ordinances regulating or intended to regulate the occupying or blocking of any street, road, or highway grade crossing by engines or passenger or freight cars, upon reasonable proof by the crew member that the occupying or blocking of the grade crossing was necessary to comply with the orders or instructions, either written or oral, of his employer or of the officers or supervisory officials of the company owning the railroad over which the engine or cars are operated; provided, however, that this Code section shall not relieve the employer or railroad company from any responsibility placed upon such employee or railroad company by any such state laws or municipal ordinances.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 645, § 1.

46-8-198.
[Reserved] Erection and placement of signboards to warn of drawbridges, grade crossings, and stations at which there is a switch.

History.

Ga. L. 1913, p. 114, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 94-509, 94-9904; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 5/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 5/SB 285 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2006.